District of Columbia statutes.
15-713

Deposits for jury trials in Superior Court.

Deposits made on demands for jury trials in accordance with rules prescribed by the Superior Court of the District of Columbia under authority granted in section 15-709 shall be earned unless, prior to three days before the time set for trial, including Sundays and legal holidays, a new date for trial is set by the court, cases are discontinued or settled, or demands for jury trials are waived.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 536, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 554, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 144(14)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 15-713.
1973 Ed., § 15-713.